sv: Typ av gasdrivmedel: 134a/drivgas; CO2; Green gas (12 kg); Green gas (14 kg); Propan; Övrigt
el: Τύπος προωθητικού αερίου: 134a/Αέριο ξεσκονίσματος; CO2; Green gas (12 kg); Green gas (14 kg); Προπάνιο; Άλλο
sl-SI: Vrsta plinskega pogonskega sredstva: 134a/potisni plin; CO2; Green gas (12 kg); Green gas (14 kg); Propan; Drugo
ru: Тип газового пропеллента: 134a / сжатый газ; CO2; Грингаз (12 кг); Грингаз (14 кг); Пропан; Другое
da: Type af drivgas: 134a/duster gas; CO2; Green gas (12 kg); Green gas (14 kg); Propan; Andet
de: Art des Gas-Treibmittels: 134a/Druckluftgas; CO2; Green Gas (12 kg); Green Gas (14 kg); Propan; Sonstige
sk-SK: Typ plynového hnacieho paliva: 134a/duster plyn; CO2; Green gas (12 kg); Green gas (14 kg); Propán; Iný
cs: Typ plynového pohonného materiálu: 134a / stlačený plyn; CO2; Green gas (12 kg); Green gas (14 kg); Propan; Ostatní
hr-HR: Vrsta plinskog pogonskog goriva: Plin 134a / plin za ispuhivanje; CO2; Zeleni plin (12 kg); Zeleni plin (14 kg); Propan; Ostalo
pt-BR: Tipo de propelente gasoso: Gás 134a/Gás de limpeza; CO2; Green gas (12 kg); Green gas (14 kg); Propano; Outro
fr: Type de gaz propulseur: 134a/Gaz dépoussiérant; CO2; Gaz vert (12 kg); Gaz vert (14 kg); Propane; Autre
nb: Gassdrivstofftype: 134a/duster gas; CO2; Green gas (12 kg); Green gas (14 kg); Propan; Annet
ko: 가스 추진제 유형: 134a/더스터 가스; CO2; 그린 가스(12kg); 그린 가스(14kg); 프로판; 기타
es: Tipo de propulsor de gas: Gas 134a/Limpiador en spray; CO2; Gas verde (12 kg); Gas verde (14 kg); Propano; Otro
pl: Rodzaj paliwa gazowego: 134a/sprężone powietrze; CO2; Green gas (12 kg); Green gas (14 kg); Propan; Inny
nl: Drijfgastype: 134a/dustergas; CO2; Greengas (12 kg); Greengas (14 kg); Propaan; Overig
it: Tipo di propellente gassoso: 134a/gas per spolverare; CO2; Green gas (12 kg); Green gas (14 kg); Propano; Altro
ro-RO: Tipul de propulsor pe gaz: Gaz 134a/aer comprimat; CO2; Green gas (12 kg); Green gas (14 kg); Propan; Altele
tr: Gaz itici türü: 134a/toz alıcı gazı; CO2; Yeşil gaz (12 kg); Yeşil gaz (14 kg); Propan; Diğer
lt-LT: Dujinio propelento tipas: 134a / suspaustas oras valymui (duster gas); CO2; „Green gas“ (12 kg); „Green gas“ (14 kg); Propanas; Kita
ja: ガス推進剤タイプ: 134a / ダスターガス; CO2; グリーンガス (12 kg); グリーンガス (14 kg); プロパン; その他
zh-CN: 气体推进剂类型: 134a/除尘气体; CO2; 绿色气体（12 千克）; 绿色气体（14 千克）; 丙烷; 其他
pt-PT: tipo de propelente gasoso: 134a/gás de limpeza; CO2; Gás verde (12 kg); Gás verde (14 kg); Propano; Outro
bg-BG: Тип газов пропелант: 134a/сгъстен въздух; CO2; Грийн газ (12 кг); Грийн газ (14 кг); Пропан; Друго
fi: Ponnekaasun tyyppi: 134a/pölynpoistokaasu; CO2; Green gas (12 kg); Green gas (14 kg); Propaani; Muu
hu: Gázhajtóanyag típusa: 134a/sűrített levegő; CO2; Green gas (12 kg); Green gas (14 kg); Propán; Egyéb
th: ประเภทก๊าซขับเคลื่อน: 134a/ก๊าซเป่าฝุ่น; CO2; แก๊สกระป๋อง (12 กก.); แก๊สกระป๋อง (14 กก.); โพรเพน; อื่นๆ
en: Gas propellant type: 134a/duster gas; CO2; Green gas (12 kg); Green gas (14 kg); Propane; Other
zh-TW: 氣體推進劑類型: 134a/除塵氣體; CO2; 環保瓦斯 (12 kg); 環保瓦斯 (14 kg); 丙烷; 其他
vi: Loại khí đẩy: 134a/Khí xịt bụi; CO2; Green gas (12 kg); Green gas (14 kg); Propane; Khác